Maine, session 132, LD1989.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-B MRSA §3873-B, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 745, §1, is
amended to read:
2. Application of fund. The department shall use the money in the fund to reimburse
the legal costs incurred by private entities the following individuals to initiate or extend
existing progressive treatment programs in accordance with section 3873‑A: the
superintendent or chief administrative officer of a private psychiatric hospital, the director
of an ACT team, a private medical practitioner, a law enforcement officer or the legal
guardian of the patient who is the subject of an application under section 3873-A. A private
entity The department may use money in the fund to reimburse a private attorney
Page 1 - 132LR2798(03)

representing an individual eligible to receive funds under this subsection. An individual
seeking reimbursement must submit to the department an itemized bill of legal costs
incurred to initiate or extend the progressive treatment program. The maximum annual
amount the department may reimburse a private entity an individual for the legal costs to
initiate a or extend an existing progressive treatment program is $800 $3,500.
Reimbursement is subject to available funds.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2798(03)